Montana, session 2025, HB703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Exemption from environmental review. The department and local building departments
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 703
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 699
are exempt from the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, for an analysis of greenhouse gases from a
covered product or appliance, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 6292, for the adoption or enforcement of the state
building code or county, city, and town building codes.
Section 2. Exemptions from environmental review. The department is not required to perform an
analysis of greenhouse gas emissions beyond the state's borders under the provisions of Title 75, chapters 1,
parts 1 and 2, from:
(1) any source not subject to state enforcement pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 7543(a) for a new motor
vehicle or a new motor vehicle engine and pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 7543(e)(1) for a new nonroad engine or
nonroad vehicle ; or
(2) beyond the state's borders.
Section 3. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of
Title 50, chapter 60, part 1, and the provisions of Title 50, chapter 60, part 1, apply to [section 1].
(2) [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 75, chapter 2, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 75, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 2].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 703
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 703, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 703
INTRODUCED BY C. SCHOMER, S. FITZPATRICK, B. MITCHELL
AN ACT EXEMPTING CERTAIN AGENCIES AND DEPARTMENTS FROM AN ANALYSIS OF GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS FROM APPLIANCES, VEHICLES, AND ENGINES; AND PROVIDING RULEMAKING
AUTHORITY.